Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1918.01
Foreclosure proceedings; county attorney fee; when effective.

Section 77-1918 shall be so interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose, to provide, in the public interest, adequate compensation as therein provided for county attorneys, and to give effect to such salary as soon as same may become operative under the Constitution of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1971, LB 743, § 3;

Laws 1972, LB 1069, § 6.